Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
346C

LONG-TERM
CARE FINANCING PROGRAM]

Section

346C-1 Definitions

346C-2 Long-term care financing program;
establishment

346C-3 Composition of the board

346C-4 Fiduciary and other obligations of the
board of

trustees

346C-5 Repealed

346C-6 Investments

346C-7 Annual audits of the long-term care
benefits fund

346C-8 Qualified long-term care services

Note

Long-term care policy goals and guidelines. L 2008, c 224,
§§2, 3.

Nursing facility sustainability program (repealed June 30,
2016 and December 31, 2016). L 2012, c 156; L 2013, c 142; L 2014, c 124; L
2015, c 69.

Revision Note

Throughout this chapter, "long-term care financing
program" substituted for "Hawaii long-term care financing
program" and "long-term care benefits fund" substituted for
"Hawaii long-term care benefits fund" pursuant to §23G-15.

Cross References

Coordination and development of caregiver support services,
see §349-15.

Nursing facility sustainability program, see chapter 346F.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next